District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.08

Penalties.

(a)

The Mayor may establish civil penalties for the violation of this chapter and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, including the establishment of civil penalties pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(b)

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulations issued pursuant to this chapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine not to exceed the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisonment not to exceed 90 days, or both, for each violation.

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 9, 56 DCR 6619
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-79, § 2(b), 63 DCR 762
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-79 designated the existing text as (a); and added (b).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-103, May 15, 2014, 61 DCR 2433).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-131, Aug. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 6336).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-8, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 4566).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-278, February 20, 2014, 61 DCR 1587).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Vending Regulations Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-343, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5709).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Classroom Animal for Educational Purposes Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-30, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4534, 21 DCSTAT 867).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Vending Regulations Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-255, Jan. 6, 2016, 63 DCR 520).